dev/adjective/adjective.ne.dix
  <!-- मिठो; म; 3 -->
    <pardef n="म/िठो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िठो</l>
          <r>िठो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िठा</l>
          <r>िठो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीठा</l>
          <r>िठो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तेजिलो; तेजिलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तेजिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बलियो; बलिय; 2 -->
    <pardef n="बलिय/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अँध्यारो; अँध्यार; 2 -->
    <pardef n="अँध्यार/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- काहिलो; काहिल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="काहिल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अधूरो; अधूरो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अधूरो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सीधा; स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स/ीधा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाधा</l>
          <r>ीधा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सदा; स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स/दा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ादा</l>
          <r>दा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कानुन; कान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कान/ुन__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ूनी</l>
          <r>ुन<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ठूलो; ठूल; 8 -->
    <pardef n="ठूल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा-ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्-ठूला</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अधिक; अधिक; 3 -->
    <pardef n="अधिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>तम</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>र</l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रमाइलो; रमाइल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="रमाइल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्पष्ट; स्पष्ट; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्पष्ट__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उत्पन्न; उत्पन्न; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उत्पन्न__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बढी; बढी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बढी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- असिजिलो; अस; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अस/िजिलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जिला</l>
          <r>िजिलो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- आधुनिक; आधुनिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="आधुनिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बिज्ञान; ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="/बिज्ञान__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>वैज्ञानिक</l>
          <r>बिज्ञान<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- खुसी; खुसी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="खुसी__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विचरा; विचर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विचर/ा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हजार; हजार; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हजार__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राजनीतिक; राजनीतिक; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राजनीतिक__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अन्य; अन्य; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अन्य__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रकृति; प्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्र/कृति__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ाकृतिक</l>
          <r>कृति<s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सूझो; स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स/ूझो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ोझासाझा</l>
          <r>ूझो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सिधा; स; 2 -->
    <pardef n="स/िधा__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ीधा</l>
          <r>िधा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>िदासादा</l>
          <r>िधा<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निकै; निकै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निकै__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माथिल्लो; माथिल्ल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="माथिल्ल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नौलो; नौल; 2 -->
    <pardef n="नौल/ो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेपाली; नेपाली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेपाली__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पुतबारो; पुतबारो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पुतबारो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेग्रिटो; नेग्रिटो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेग्रिटो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लाख; लाख; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लाख__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="nt"/><s n="qnt"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- निलो; निलो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="निलो__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="मिठो"><i>म</i><par n="म/िठो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="तेजिलो"><i>तेजिलो</i><par n="तेजिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बलियो"><i>बलिय</i><par n="बलिय/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अँध्यारो"><i>अँध्यार</i><par n="अँध्यार/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="काहिलो"><i>काहिल</i><par n="काहिल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अधूरो"><i>अधूरो</i><par n="अधूरो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सीधा"><i>स</i><par n="स/ीधा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सदा"><i>स</i><par n="स/दा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="कानुन"><i>कान</i><par n="कान/ुन__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ठूलो"><i>ठूल</i><par n="ठूल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अधिक"><i>अधिक</i><par n="अधिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="रमाइलो"><i>रमाइल</i><par n="रमाइल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="स्पष्ट"><i>स्पष्ट</i><par n="स्पष्ट__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="उत्पन्न"><i>उत्पन्न</i><par n="उत्पन्न__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बढी"><i>बढी</i><par n="बढी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="असिजिलो"><i>अस</i><par n="अस/िजिलो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="आधुनिक"><i>आधुनिक</i><par n="आधुनिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="बिज्ञान"><i></i><par n="/बिज्ञान__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="खुसी"><i>खुसी</i><par n="खुसी__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="विचरा"><i>विचर</i><par n="विचर/ा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="हजार"><i>हजार</i><par n="हजार__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="राजनीतिक"><i>राजनीतिक</i><par n="राजनीतिक__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="अन्य"><i>अन्य</i><par n="अन्य__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रकृति"><i>प्र</i><par n="प्र/कृति__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सूझो"><i>स</i><par n="स/ूझो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="सिधा"><i>स</i><par n="स/िधा__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निकै"><i>निकै</i><par n="निकै__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="माथिल्लो"><i>माथिल्ल</i><par n="माथिल्ल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नौलो"><i>नौल</i><par n="नौल/ो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नेपाली"><i>नेपाली</i><par n="नेपाली__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="पुतबारो"><i>पुतबारो</i><par n="पुतबारो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="नेग्रिटो"><i>नेग्रिटो</i><par n="नेग्रिटो__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="लाख"><i>लाख</i><par n="लाख__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="निलो"><i>निलो</i><par n="निलो__adj"/></e>
